Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,164
Department of Health and Human Services; adopt rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 77-27,160 to 77-27,173.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 801;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 202.